dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="गेल/ा__adj">
       <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>्यावर</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="लहान__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="माग__adj"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ची</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ील</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ून</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="जवळ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ची</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ील</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="पुढ/े__adj">
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="adv"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r>े<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ची</l><r>े<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r>े<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ील</l><r>े<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="छान__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs  -->

    <pardef n="खूप__preadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="तिथे__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कुठे__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="चटकन__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="पहिल्/यांदा__adv">
      <e><p><l>यांदा</l><r>यांदा<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->
    
    <pardef n="केला__vaux">
     <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/आहे__vbser">
      <e><p><l>आहे</l><r>आहे<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>आहेत</l><r>आहे<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होता</l><r>आहे<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>होते</l><r>आहे<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="झा__vbser">
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ली</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ले</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अचम्भित"><i>अचम्भित</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आनंदी"><i>आनंदी</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काही"><i>काही</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुश"><i>खुश</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खूप"><i>खूप</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गरम"><i>गरम</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गार"><i>गार</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गेला"><i>गेल</i><par n="गेल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छान"><i>छान</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जवळ"><i>जवळ</i><par n="जवळ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जाड"><i>जाड</i><par n="लहान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झला"><i>झल</i><par n="गेल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तीक्ष्ण"><i>तीक्ष्ण</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थंड"><i>थंड</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नरम"><i>नरम</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पातळ"><i>पातळ</i><par n="जवळ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुढे"><i>पुढ</i><par n="पुढ/े__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुरे"><i>पुरे</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्ण"><i>पूर्ण</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फार"><i>फार</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बहुतेक"><i>बहुतेक</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माग"><i>माग</i><par n="माग__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लहान"><i>लहान</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्पष्ट"><i>स्पष्ट</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संपूर्ण"><i>संपूर्ण</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साँवलस"><i>साँवलस</i><par n="छान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अजून"><i>अजून</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अस"><i>अस</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आत"><i>आत</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आता"><i>आता</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आवतीभोवती"><i>आवतीभोवती</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकत्र"><i>एकत्र</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कधी"><i>कधी</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i>का</i><par n="कुठे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कुठे"><i>कुठे</i><par n="कुठे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खूप"><i>खूप</i><par n="खूप__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="काळजीपूर्वक"><i>काळजीपूर्वक</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चटकन"><i>चटकन</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जसे"><i>जसे</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जेव्हा"><i>जेव्हा</i><par n="कुठे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तिकडे"><i>तिकडे</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तिथे"><i>तिथे</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तेंव्हा"><i>तेंव्हा</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दोघेही"><i>दोघेही</i><par n="खूप__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="पटकन"><i>पटकन</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दुर्लक्ष"><i>दुर्लक्ष</i><par n="खूप__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="नाही"><i>नाही</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नीट"><i>नीट</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नेहमी"><i>नेहमी</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिल्यांदा"><i>पहिल्</i><par n="पहिल्/यांदा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मग"><i>मग</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लवकर"><i>लवकर</i><par n="खूप__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="सध्या"><i>सध्या</i><par n="तिथे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सावकाश"><i>सावकाश</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हळूहळू"><i>हळूहळू</i><par n="चटकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आहे"><i></i><par n="/आहे__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="केला"><i>केला</i><par n="केला__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="झा"><i>झा</i><par n="झा__vbser"/></e>
